src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kaqggwrz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kaʼggõrz: # Noun 230 'eng /est kaer/fin' - full paradigm
     kaʼggõrz+N+Sg+Nom: [kaʼggõrz, kaggõrz]
     kaʼggõrz+N+Sg+Gen: [kaʼggõr, kaggõr]
     kaʼggõrz+N+Sg+Par: [kaʼggõrzt, kaggõrzt]
     kaʼggõrz+N+Sg+Dat: [kaʼggõrõn, kaggõrõn]
     kaʼggõrz+N+Sg+Ins: [kaʼggõrõks, kaggõrõks]
     kaʼggõrz+N+Sg+Ill: [kaʼggõrõ, kaggõrõ]
     kaʼggõrz+N+Sg+Ela: [kaʼggõrõst, kaggõrõst]
     kaʼggõrz+N+Pl+Nom: [kaʼggõrd, kaggõrd]
     kaʼggõrz+N+Pl+Gen: [kaʼggõrd, kaggõrd]
     kaʼggõrz+N+Pl+Par: [kaʼggiri, kaggiri]
     kaʼggõrz+N+Pl+Dat: [kaʼggõrdõn, kaggõrdõn]
     kaʼggõrz+N+Pl+Ins: [kaʼggõrdõks, kaggõrdõks]
     kaʼggõrz+N+Pl+Ill: [kaʼggiriž, kaggiriž]
     kaʼggõrz+N+Pl+Ela: [kaʼggirist, kaggirist]
